Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 16. Protected Series.
§ 13.1-1099.9.
Remedies of judgment creditor of associated member or protected series assignee.

Any provision of §

13.1-1041.1

that provides or restricts remedies available to a judgment creditor of a member of a limited liability company or owner of a membership interest of the series limited liability company applies to a judgment creditor of:

An associated member or protected series assignee of a protected series; or

A series limited liability company, to the extent the series limited liability company owns a protected series membership interest of a protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.10.
Enforcement of claim against non-associated asset.

As used in this section:“Enforcement date” means 12:01 a.m. on the date on which a claimant first serves process on a series limited liability company or protected series of the series limited liability company in an action seeking to enforce under this section a claim against an asset of the series limited liability company or protected series by attachment, levy, or other action.“Incurrence date” means, subject to subsection B of §

13.1-1099.20

, the date on which a series limited liability company or protected series of the series limited liability company incurred the liability giving rise to a claim that a claimant seeks to enforce under this section.

If a claim against a series limited liability company or a protected series of the series limited liability company has been reduced to judgment, in addition to any other remedy provided by law or equity, the judgment may be enforced in accordance with the following rules:

A judgment against the series limited liability company may be enforced against an asset of a protected series of the series limited liability company if the asset:

Was a non-associated asset of the protected series on the incurrence date; or

Is a non-associated asset of the protected series on the enforcement date.

A judgment against a protected series may be enforced against an asset of the series limited liability company if the asset:

A judgment against a protected series may be enforced against an asset of another protected series of the series limited liability company if the asset:

In addition to any other remedy provided by law or equity, if a claim against a series limited liability company or a protected series of the series limited liability company has not been reduced to a judgment and law other than this article permits a prejudgment remedy by attachment, levy, or other action, the court may apply subsection B as a prejudgment remedy.

In a proceeding under this section, the party asserting that an asset is or was an associated asset of a series limited liability company or a protected series of the series limited liability company has the burden of proof on the issue.

This section applies to an asset of a foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company if:

The asset is real or tangible property located in the Commonwealth;

The claimant is a resident of the Commonwealth or transacting business or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth, or the claim under this section is to enforce a judgment, or to seek a pre-judgment remedy, pertaining to a liability arising from law of the Commonwealth other than this article or an act or omission in the Commonwealth; and

The asset is not identified in the records of the foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company in a manner comparable to the manner required by §

13.1-1099.2

.

a.

Was a non-associated asset of the series limited liability company on the incurrence date; or

b.

Is a non-associated asset of the series limited liability company on the enforcement date.

a.

Was a non-associated asset of the other protected series on the incurrence date; or

b.

Is a non-associated asset of the other protected series on the enforcement date.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-1099.11.
Events causing dissolution of protected series.

A protected series of a series limited liability company is dissolved, and its activities and affairs shall be wound up, upon the:

Dissolution of the series limited liability company;

Occurrence of an event or circumstance the operating agreement states causes dissolution of the protected series;

Affirmative vote or consent of all the members;

Entry of a court order dissolving the protected series on application by an associated member or protected series manager of the protected series:

In accordance with §

13.1-1094

; and

To the same extent, in the same manner, and on the same grounds the court would enter an order dissolving a limited liability company on application by a member of or a person managing the limited liability company;

Entry by the court of an order dissolving the protected series on application by the series limited liability company or a member of the series limited liability company on the ground that the conduct of all or substantially all the activities and affairs of the protected series is illegal;

Automatic cancellation of its existence pursuant to §§

13.1-1050.2

and

13.1-1099.1

; or

Automatic or involuntary cancellation of the existence of the series limited liability company that established the protected series pursuant to §

13.1-1050.2

or

13.1-1050.3

.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.12.
Winding up dissolved protected series; voluntary cancellation.

Subject to subsection B and in accordance with §

13.1-1094

:

A dissolved protected series shall wind up its activities and affairs in the same manner that a limited liability company winds up its affairs under Article 9 (§

13.1-1046

et seq.); and

Judicial supervision or other judicial remedy is available in the winding up of the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that apply under Article 9 (§

13.1-1046

et seq.) in the winding up of a limited liability company.

When the affairs of a protected series have been wound up, the series limited liability company that established the protected series shall deliver to the Commission for filing a statement of designation cancellation setting forth:

The name of the protected series;

The identification number issued by the Commission to the protected series;

The name of the series limited liability company that established the protected series;

The effective date of the certificate of protected series designation;

A statement that the protected series has completed the winding up its affairs; and

Any other information that the associated members of the protected series determine to include therein, including the reason for the filing of the statement of designation cancellation.

If the Commission finds that the statement of designation cancellation complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall by order issue a certificate of designation cancellation, canceling the protected series’ existence. Upon the effective date of such certificate, the existence of the protected series shall cease, except for the purpose of suits, other proceedings, and appropriate actions by members as provided in this chapter.

A series limited liability company does not complete its winding up until each of its protected series has completed its winding up.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-1099.13.
Waiver of cancellation upon dissolution; reinstatement of series limited liability company.

If after dissolution the members of a series limited liability company waive the right to have the series limited liability company’s affairs wound up and its existence canceled:

Each protected series of the series limited liability company ceases winding up; and

The provisions of §

13.1-1047.1

stating the results of the waiver apply to each protected series of the series limited liability company in accord with §

13.1-1094

.

A protected series that has ceased to exist may have its existence reinstated in accordance with §

13.1-1050.4

as if it were a limited liability company, provided that the series limited liability company that established the protected series is in existence.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.14.
Protected series may not be party to entity transaction.

A protected series may not:

Be a party to a merger;

Convert to a different type of entity;

Domesticate as a protected series under the laws of a foreign jurisdiction; or

Be a party to or be formed, organized, established, or created in a transaction substantially like an interest exchange, a conversion, or a domestication.

History.

2019, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “like an interest exchange, a conversion, or a domestication” for “like a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication” in subdivision 4. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1099.15.
Restrictions on entity transaction involving a series limited liability company or a foreign series limited liability company.

A series limited liability company may not:

Convert to a different type of entity;

Domesticate as a foreign limited liability company pursuant to the provisions of Article 14 (§

13.1-1074

et seq.); or

Except as otherwise provided in §

13.1-1099.16

, be a party to or the surviving company of a merger.

A foreign series limited liability company may not domesticate as a Virginia limited liability company pursuant to the provisions of Article 14 (§

13.1-1074

et seq.).

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-1099.16.
Merger authorized; parties restricted.

A series limited liability company may be party to a merger in accordance with Article 13 (§

13.1-1069.1

et seq.), this section, and §§

13.1-1099.17

through

13.1-1099.20

only if:

Each party to the merger is a limited liability company; and

The surviving company is not created in the merger.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-1099.17.
Plan of merger.

In a merger under §

13.1-1099.16

, the plan of merger shall:

Comply with §

13.1-1070

;

Include the manner and basis of converting the protected series membership interests in the canceled protected series in the manner set forth in subdivisions C 4 and 5 of §

13.1-1070

; and

State:

For any protected series of a non-surviving series limited liability company, whether after the merger the protected series will be a relocated protected series or be dissolved, wound up, and canceled;

For any protected series of the surviving series limited liability company that exists before the merger, whether after the merger the protected series will be a continuing protected series or be dissolved, wound up, and canceled;

For each relocated protected series, its new name; and

For any protected series to be established by the surviving company as a result of the merger, the name of the protected series and the post office address of its principal office.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.18.
Articles of merger.

In a merger under §

13.1-1099.16

, the articles of merger shall:

Comply with §

13.1-1072

and include a plan of merger that complies with the provisions of §

13.1-1099.17

;

Be accompanied by the following records, each to become effective when the merger becomes effective:

For a protected series of a merging company being canceled as a result of the merger, a statement of designation cancellation;

For a protected series of a non-surviving company which after the merger will be a relocated protected series:

A statement of relocation that contains the name of the non-surviving company and the name of the protected series before and after the merger; and

A statement of protected series designation; and

For a protected series being established by the surviving company as a result of the merger, a statement of protected series designation; and

A statement presented with articles of merger pursuant to this section may be filed with the Commission without payment of the fee specified in §

13.1-1005

.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.19.
Effect of merger.

When a merger under §

13.1-1099.16

becomes effective, in addition to the effects stated in §

13.1-1073

:

As provided in the plan of merger, each protected series of each merging company which was established before the merger:

Is a relocated protected series or continuing protected series; or

Is dissolved, wound up, and canceled;

Any change in the rights or obligations of a person in the person’s capacity as an associated member or protected series assignee of a relocated protected series or continuing protected series takes effect; and

Any consideration to be paid to a person that before the merger was an associated member or protected series assignee of a relocated protected series or continuing protected series is due; and

Any protected series to be established as a result of the merger is established;

Any relocated protected series or continuing protected series is the same person without interruption as it was before the merger;

All property of a relocated protected series or continuing protected series continues to be vested in the protected series without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of a relocated protected series or continuing protected series continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the protected series;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of merger, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of a relocated protected series or continuing protected series remain in the protected series;

The new name of a relocated protected series may be substituted for the former name of the protected series in any pending action or proceeding;

If provided in the plan of merger:

Any person that is a member of a relocated protected series becomes a member of the surviving company, if not already a member.

a.

A person becomes an associated member or protected series assignee of a relocated protected series or continuing protected series;

b.

A person becomes an associated member of a protected series established by the surviving company as a result of the merger;

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.20.
Application of § 13.1-1099.10 after merger.

A creditor’s right that existed under §

13.1-1099.10

immediately before a merger under §

13.1-1099.16

may be enforced after the merger in accordance with the following rules:

A creditor’s right that existed immediately before the merger against the surviving company, a continuing protected series, or a relocated protected series continues without change after the merger.

A creditor’s right that existed immediately before the merger against a non-surviving company:

May be asserted against an asset of the non-surviving company that vested in the surviving company as a result of the merger; and

Does not otherwise change.

An asset of the surviving company, other than an asset of the non-surviving company that vested in the surviving company as a result of the merger;

An asset of a continuing protected series;

An asset of a protected series established by the surviving company as a result of the merger;

If the creditor’s right was against an asset of the non-surviving company, an asset of a relocated protected series; or

If the creditor’s right was against an asset of a relocated protected series, an asset of a relocated protected series.

Subject to subsection B, the following rules apply:

For the purposes of subdivision A 3 and subdivisions B 1a, B 2a, and B 3a of §

13.1-1099.10

, the incurrence date is deemed to be the date on which the merger becomes effective.

A merger under §

13.1-1099.16

does not affect the manner in which §

13.1-1099.10

applies to a liability incurred after the merger.

a.

In addition to the remedy stated in subdivision 1, a creditor with a right under §

13.1-1099.10

that existed immediately before the merger against a non-surviving company or a relocated protected series may assert the right against:

b.

In addition to the remedy stated in subdivision 2, a creditor with a right that existed immediately before the merger against the surviving company or a continuing protected series may assert the right against:

(1)

An asset of a relocated protected series; or

(2)

An asset of a non-surviving company that vested in the surviving company as a result of the merger.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.21.
Governing law; foreign series limited liability companies and foreign protected series.

The law of the jurisdiction of formation of a foreign series limited liability company governs:

The internal affairs of a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company, including:

Relations among any associated members of the foreign protected series;

Relations between the foreign protected series and:

Any associated member;

The protected series manager; or

Any protected series assignee;

Relations between any associated member and:

The rights and duties of a protected series manager;

Governance decisions affecting the activities and affairs of the foreign protected series and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

Procedures and conditions for becoming an associated member or protected series assignee;

Relations between the foreign protected series and:

Except as otherwise provided in §§

13.1-1099.8

and

13.1-1099.10

, the liability of a person for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a foreign protected series of a foreign series limited liability company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the person being or acting as:

Except as otherwise provided in §§

13.1-1099.8

and

13.1-1099.10

:

(1)

The protected series manager; and

(2)

Any protected series assignee;

a.

The foreign series limited liability company;

b.

Another foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company;

c.

A member of the foreign series limited liability company that is not an associated member of the foreign protected series;

d.

A foreign protected series manager that is not a protected series manager of the protected series;

e.

A foreign protected series assignee that is not a foreign protected series assignee of the protected series; and

f.

An assignee of a membership interest of the foreign series limited liability company;

a.

An associated member, protected series assignee, or protected series manager of the foreign protected series;

b.

A member of the foreign series limited liability company that is not an associated member of the foreign protected series;

c.

A protected series manager of another foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company;

d.

A protected series assignee of another foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company;

e.

A manager of the foreign series limited liability company; or

f.

An assignee of a membership interest of the foreign series limited liability company; and

a.

The liability of the foreign series limited liability company for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the foreign protected series being a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company or the foreign series limited liability company:

(1)

Being or acting as a foreign protected series manager of the foreign protected series;

(2)

Having the foreign protected series manage the foreign series limited liability company; or

(3)

Owning a protected series membership interest of the foreign protected series; and

b.

The liability of a foreign protected series for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the foreign series limited liability company or another foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the foreign protected series:

(1)

Being a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company or having the foreign series limited liability company or another foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company be or act as a foreign protected series manager of the foreign protected series; or

(2)

Managing the foreign series limited liability company or being or acting as a foreign protected series manager of another foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.22.
No attribution of activities constituting transacting business or for establishing jurisdiction.

In determining whether a foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company transacts business in the Commonwealth or is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth:

The activities and affairs of the foreign series limited liability company are not attributable to a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company solely by reason of the foreign protected series being a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company; and

The activities and affairs of a foreign protected series are not attributable to the foreign series limited liability company or another foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company solely by reason of the foreign protected series being a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.23.
Registration of foreign series limited liability company and foreign protected series; amended application; voluntary cancellation; reinstatement.

A foreign series limited liability company shall obtain from the Commission a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth before any foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth. In addition to the requirements for registration in §

13.1-1052

, the foreign series limited liability company shall include an attachment to its application that lists the name of each foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company and the jurisdiction under whose law each is established.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and subject to §§

13.1-1099.8

and

13.1-1099.10

, the provisions of Article 10 (§

13.1-1051

et seq.) governing foreign limited liability companies apply to a foreign protected series as if the foreign protected series were a foreign limited liability company organized separately from the foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series and distinct from the foreign series limited liability company and any other foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company.

An application by a foreign protected series for a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth shall meet the requirements of §

13.1-1052

and shall also include:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and post office address of the principal office of the foreign protected series applying for registration; and

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series.

The registered agent and registered office of a foreign protected series shall be the same as the foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series.

The name of a foreign protected series applying for a certificate of registration or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth shall comply with §

13.1-1096

. A foreign protected series may comply with §

13.1-1096

pursuant to §

13.1-1054

.

The requirement in §

13.1-1055

to amend an application for registration of a foreign limited liability company shall be applicable to a foreign protected series that has a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

Whenever the certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth of a foreign series limited liability company is canceled, any certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth issued to a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series shall thereupon be automatically canceled.

A foreign protected series whose certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth has been canceled may have its certificate of registration reinstated in accordance with §

13.1-1056.3

as if it were a foreign limited liability company, provided that the foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series has a certificate of registration in effect.

A foreign protected series registered to transact business in the Commonwealth may apply to the Commission for a certificate of cancellation to cancel its certificate of registration as a foreign protected series. The application shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission, which shall set forth:

The name of the foreign protected series, the name of the foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series, the name of the jurisdiction of formation of the foreign series limited liability company, and the identification number issued by the Commission to the foreign series limited liability company;

If applicable, a statement that the foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series was a party to a merger permitted by the laws of its jurisdiction of formation and that it was not the surviving entity of the merger, or has converted to another type of entity under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation;

That the foreign protected series is not transacting business in the Commonwealth and that it surrenders its registration to transact business in the Commonwealth;

That the foreign protected series revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A mailing address to which the clerk of the Commission may mail a copy of any process served on the clerk under subdivision 4; and

A commitment to notify the clerk of the Commission in the future of any change in the mailing address of the foreign protected series.

The Commission shall not issue a certificate of cancellation to any foreign protected series unless the foreign protected series files with the Commission a statement certifying that the foreign protected series has filed returns and has paid all state taxes to the time of the statement, or a statement that no returns are required to be filed or taxes are required to be paid. In that case the foreign protected series may file returns and pay taxes before they would otherwise be due. If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of cancellation canceling the certificate of registration.

Service of process on the clerk of the Commission is service of process on a foreign protected series whose certificate of registration has been canceled pursuant to this section. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

, and service upon the foreign protected series may be made in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.24.
Disclosure required when foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series subject to proceeding.

Not later than 30 days after becoming a party to a proceeding before a civil, criminal, administrative, or other adjudicative tribunal of the Commonwealth or a tribunal of the United States located in the Commonwealth:

A foreign series limited liability company shall disclose to each other party the name and the street and mailing addresses of:

Each foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company; and

Each foreign protected series manager of and an agent for service of process for each foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company; and

A foreign protected series of a foreign series limited liability company shall disclose to each other party the name and the street and mailing addresses of:

If a foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series challenges the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal, the requirement that the foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series make disclosure under subsection A is tolled until the tribunal determines whether it has personal jurisdiction.

If a foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series does not comply with subsection A, a party to the proceeding may:

Request the tribunal to treat the noncompliance as a failure to comply with the tribunal’s discovery rules; or

Bring a separate proceeding in the tribunal to enforce subsection A.

a.

The foreign series limited liability company that established the foreign protected series, each person managing the foreign series limited liability company, and an agent for service of process for the foreign series limited liability company; and

b.

Any other foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company and each protected series manager of and an agent for service of process for the other protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.25.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this article, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact the Uniform Protected Series Act.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.26.
Effect on certain actions.

This article does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before July 1, 2021.

History.

2019, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “2021” for “2020.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1099.27.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101 of that Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103 of that Act (15 U.S.C. § 7003 (b)).

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”